Rhode Island statutes. Title 11 Criminal Offenses
Chapter 70
False Representation of Military Status

11-70-1.
False representation of military status prohibited — Stolen valor.

A person commits the crime of stolen valor if he or she knowingly, with the intent to obtain money or property:

Fraudulently represents himself or herself to be an active member or veteran of the United States Navy, Army, Air Force, Marines, or Coast Guard, including armed forces reserves and National Guard, through the unauthorized manufacture, sale, or use of military regalia or gear, including the wearing of military uniforms, or the use of falsified military identification, and obtains money or property through such fraudulent representation; or

Fraudulently represents himself or herself to be a recipient of the Congressional Medal of Honor, Distinguished Service Cross, Navy Cross, Air Force Cross, Silver Star, Purple Heart, Combat Infantryman Badge, Combat Action Badge, Combat Medical Badge, Combat Action Ribbon, or Air Force Combat Action Medal, and obtains money or property through such fraudulent representation.

A person who commits the crime of stolen valor is guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be punished by imprisonment for not more than one year or by a fine of one thousand dollars ($1,000), or both.

Any monies collected pursuant to this chapter shall be forwarded to the office of the adjutant general to be allocated to the Rhode Island military family relief fund established pursuant to §

30-3-41

.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 67, § 1, effective June 15, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 68, § 1, effective June 15, 2022.